Massachusetts, session 194th, H5486.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The purpose of this Act is to allow, but not require the Town of Wayland
and its subdivisions to satisfy legal notice requirements entirely by digital publication as voted
necessary by its Select Board in light of the changing landscape of print newspaper businesses,
particularly at the local level.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding subsection (b) of section 13 of chapter 4 of the General
Laws, wherever the Town of Wayland, Wayland Public Schools and/or their subdivisions,
committees, boards, commissions, or officers are required by statute, ordinance, by-law or
judicial order to publish a legal notice in a newspaper or newspaper of general circulation, the
person, corporation, agency, authority, municipality or other legal entity may satisfy such
requirement by one or more of the following means as authorized by local vote in Section 3:
A. a newspaper of local or general circulation’s print publication;
of 3

B. a newspaper’s website;
C. websites reporting local news and opinion which satisfy all criteria for digital
publication as set forth in said subsection (b) of section 13 of chapter 4 of the General Laws;
D. a statewide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices; or
E. a town wide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices;
SECTION 3.
A. For all legal notices to be issued by Town of Wayland boards, committees,
commissions and officials, including, but not limited to the Wayland Zoning Board of Appeals,
the Conservation Commission, the Wayland Historic District Commissions, the Town Manager,
Town Treasurer, Town Clerk, Police Chief, Fire Chief, and Building Commissioner, the Select
Board by majority vote shall determine at least two of the means of legal notice publication set
forth in Section 2 to satisfy publication requirements.
B. For all legal notices to be issued by Wayland Public School boards, committees,
commissions and officials, the School Committee by majority vote shall determine at least two
of the means of legal notice publication set forth in Section 2.
C. The Select Board and School Committee may revisit their means of publication votes
at their discretion and elect different means of publication from the options afforded under
Section 2 by majority vote.
SECTION 4. Nothing set forth in this Act shall be construed to alter or amend the time or
timing of publication of legal notices set forth in the General Laws.
of 3

SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon passage.
of 3